Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1458XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1458XD (1) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 69. Develop and administer a purple
star school initiative that recognizes applicant schools in
this state that have demonstrated a commitment to supporting
military-connected students and the families of such students
with the goal of increasing the amount of support that schools
in this state make available to military-connected students and
the families of such students.